North Dakota, session 69, SB2319.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT STUDY - PERIODICALLY RECONVENED
SESSIONS OF THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY. During the 2025-26 interim, the legislative
management shall consider studying the use of periodically reconvened sessions of the
legislative assembly. The study must include consideration of the legislative assembly
reconvening, as determined by legislative management, for three consecutive natural days
each month except for December, on a Friday, Saturday, and Sunday, and in addition up to
seven consecutive natural days each year. The study may include consideration of alternate
proposals for periodically reconvening and a review of the timing of the meeting of the
legislative assembly for organizational and orientation purposes. The legislative management
shall report its findings and recommendations, together with any legislation required to
implement the recommendations, to the seventieth legislative assembly.
Page No. 1 25.0707.02000